Idaho, session 2025, SJR101.
Be it enacted by the Leg-
islature of the State of Idaho."
(2) The people reserve to themselves the power to approve or re-
ject at the polls any act or measure passed by the legislature. This
power is known as the referendum, and legal voters may, under such
conditions and in such manner as may be provided by acts of the leg-
islature, demand a referendum vote on any act or measure passed by
the legislature and cause the same to be submitted to a vote of the
people for their approval or rejection.
(3) The people reserve to themselves the power to propose laws, and
enact the same at the polls independent of the legislature. This
power is known as the initiative, and legal voters may, under such
conditions and in such manner as may be provided by acts of the leg-
islature, initiate any desired legislation and cause the same to be
submitted to the vote of the people at a general election for their
approval or rejection.
(4) Before any referendum petition or initiative petition may be
submitted to the vote of the people, there must be affixed thereto
the signatures of legal voters from each legislative district equal
in number to at least six percent of the legal voters at the time of
the last general election.
SECTION 2. The question to be submitted to the electors of the State of
Idaho at the next general election shall be as follows:
"Shall Section 1, Article III of the Constitution of the State of Idaho
be amended to provide that, before any referendum petition or initiative pe-
tition may be submitted to a vote of the people, there must be affixed thereto


the signatures of legal voters from each legislative district equal in num-
ber to at least six percent (6%) of the legal voters at the time of the last
general election?"
SECTION 3. The Legislative Council is directed to prepare the state-
ments required by Section 67-453, Idaho Code, and file the same.
SECTION 4. The Secretary of State is hereby directed to publish this
proposed constitutional amendment and arguments as required by law.